Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-925
Compliance with act; required; when.

(1) By July 1, 2001, a licensee shall provide an initial notice, as required by section 44-904, to consumers who are the licensee's customers on July 1, 2001, with regard to nonpublic personal financial information.

(2) Until July 1, 2002, a contract that a licensee has entered into with a nonaffiliated third party to perform services for the licensee or functions on the licensee's behalf satisfies the provisions of subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of section 44-913, even if the contract does not include a requirement that the third party maintain the confidentiality of nonpublic personal information, as long as the licensee entered into the agreement on or before July 1, 2000.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 25.